District of Columbia statutes.
29-411.03

Demand.

A person shall not commence a derivative proceeding until:

(1)

A demand in the form of a record has been delivered to the nonprofit corporation to take suitable action; and

(2)

Ninety days have expired from the date the demand was effective unless:

(A)

The person has earlier been notified that the demand has been rejected by the corporation; or

(B)

Irreparable injury to the corporation would result by waiting for the expiration of the 90-day period.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720